District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.09

Repealed

Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 10, 56 DCR 1596
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(g), 58 DCR 717
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9090, 58 DCR 6226